Alabama, session 2026rs, SB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, the state
minimum wage shall be ten dollars ($10.00) per hour.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), each employer
shall pay its employees at a rate not less than the state
minimum wage.
(c)(1) This section shall not apply to any small
business.
Page 1

business.
SB171 INTRODUCED
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "small
business" means any employer with 50 or less employees.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2